Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.235.100

Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction shall have power to adopt rules as may be necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter.

[ 1993 c 333 s 5; 1990 c 33 s 245; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.30.070. Prior: 1967 ex.s. c 92 s 6. Formerly RCW 28A.30.070, 28.30.070.]